Alabama, session 2026rs, HB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 33-5-27, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§33-5-27
(a) For the purposes of this section, the term "marine
Page 1

(a) For the purposes of this section, the term "marine
event" means any event held on or adjacent to the waters of
this state which includes vessel occupants as participants or
spectators. The term includes any regatta, motorboat, or other
boat race, marine parade, exhibition, competition, fishing
tournament, or other water sport tournament.
(b) The secretary shall adopt and may amend rules
concerning the safety of vessels and persons observing or
participating in any regatta, motorboat, or other boat race,
marine parade, tournament, or exhibition marine event. The
rules adopted by the secretary may prescribe permit
requirements or similar event authorization requirements for
marine events.
(b)(c) Any person sponsoring a regatta, motorboat, or
other boat race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition
marine event shall be responsible for providing adequate
protection from marine traffic interference and hazards.
(d) Any fishing tournament consisting of 30 vessels or
fewer is not required to obtain an event permit or any similar
event authorization adopted by the secretary."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2